California statutes. Corporations Code
(a) A foreign limited liability company transacting intrastate business in this state shall not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it has a certificate of registration to transact intrastate business in this state.

(b) The failure of a foreign limited liability company to have a certificate of registration to transact intrastate business in this state does not prevent the foreign limited liability company from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

(c) A member or manager of a foreign limited liability company is not liable for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the foreign limited liability company solely because
 the foreign limited liability company transacted intrastate business in this state without a certificate of registration.

(d) If a foreign limited liability company transacts intrastate business in this state without a certificate of registration or cancels its certificate of registration, it shall be deemed to have appointed the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process for rights of action arising out of the transaction of intrastate business in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 775, Sec. 17.   (AB 506)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17708.08.

If the members of a foreign limited liability company residing in this state represent 25 percent or more of the voting interests of the members of that foreign limited liability company, those members shall be entitled to all information and inspection rights provided in Section 17704.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17708.09.

The Attorney General may maintain an action to enjoin a foreign limited liability company from transacting intrastate business in this state in violation of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------



ARTICLE 9. Actions by Members [17709.01. - 17709.02.]

17709.01.

Any member of a foreign or domestic limited liability company may bring a class action on behalf of all or a class of members to enforce any claim common to those members and any of those actions shall be governed by the law governing class actions generally, provided that in order to maintain the class action there shall be no requirement that the class be so numerous that joinder of all members of the class is impracticable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17709.02.

(a) No action shall be instituted or maintained in right of any domestic or foreign limited liability company by any member of the limited liability company unless both of the following conditions exist:

(1) The plaintiff alleges in the complaint that the plaintiff was a member, of record or beneficially, at the time of the transaction or any part of the transaction of which the plaintiff complains, or that the plaintiff’s interest later devolved upon the plaintiff by operation of law from a member who was a member at the time of the transaction or any part of the transaction complained of. Any member who does not meet these requirements may nevertheless be allowed in the
 discretion of the court to maintain the action on a preliminary showing to and determination by the court, by motion and after a hearing at which the court shall consider any evidence, by affidavit or testimony, as it deems material, of all of the following:

(A) There is a strong prima facie case in favor of the claim asserted on behalf of the limited liability company.

(B) No other similar action has been or is likely to be instituted.

(C) The plaintiff acquired the interest before there was disclosure to the public or to the plaintiff of the wrongdoing of which plaintiff complains.

(D) Unless the action can be maintained, the defendant may retain a gain
 derived from defendant’s willful breach of a fiduciary duty.

(E) The requested relief will not result in unjust enrichment of the limited liability company or any member of the limited liability company.

(2) The plaintiff alleges in the complaint with particularity the plaintiff’s efforts to secure from the managers the action the plaintiff desires or the reasons for not making that effort, and alleges further that the plaintiff has either informed the limited liability company or the managers in writing of the ultimate facts of each cause of action against each defendant or delivered to the limited liability company or the managers a true copy of the complaint that the plaintiff proposes to file.

(b) In any action
 referred to in subdivision (a), at any time within 30 days after service of summons upon the limited liability company or upon any defendant who is a manager of the limited liability company or held that position at the time of the acts complained of, the limited liability company or the defendant may move the court for an order, upon notice and hearing, requiring the plaintiff to furnish security as hereinafter provided. The motion shall be based upon one or both of the following grounds:

(1) That there is no reasonable possibility that the prosecution of the cause of action alleged in the complaint against the moving party will benefit the limited liability company or its members.

(2) That the moving party, if other than the limited liability company did not participate in the
 transaction complained of in any capacity. The court, on application of the limited liability company or any defendant, may, for good cause shown, extend the 30-day period for an additional period not exceeding 60 days.

(c) (1) At the hearing upon any motion pursuant to subdivision (b), the court shall consider evidence, written or oral, by witnesses or affidavit, as may be material to the ground upon which the motion is based, or to a determination of the probable reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees, of the limited liability company and the moving party that will be incurred in the defense of the action.

(2) If the court determines, after hearing the evidence adduced by the parties, that the moving party has established a probability in
 support of any of the grounds upon which the motion is based, the court shall fix the nature and amount of security, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), to be furnished by the plaintiff for reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees, that may be incurred by the moving party and the limited liability company in connection with the action. A ruling by the court on the motion shall not be a determination of any issue in the action or of the merits of the action. The amount of the security may thereafter be increased or decreased in the discretion of the court upon a showing that the security provided has or may become inadequate or is excessive, but the court shall not in any event increase the total amount of the security beyond fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the aggregate for all defendants. If the court, upon a motion, makes a determination that security shall be furnished by the plaintiff
 as to any one or more defendants, the action shall be dismissed as to that defendant or those defendants, unless the security required by the court has been furnished within any reasonable time as shall be fixed by the court. The limited liability company and the moving party shall have recourse to the security in the amount that the court determines upon the termination of the action.

(d) If the plaintiff, either before or after a motion is made pursuant to subdivision (b), or any order or determination pursuant to that motion, posts good and sufficient bond or bonds in the aggregate amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to secure the reasonable expenses of the parties entitled to make the motion, the plaintiff shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of this section and with any order for security made pursuant to this
 section. Any motion then pending shall be dismissed and no further or additional bond or other security shall be required.

(e) If a motion is filed pursuant to subdivision (b), no pleadings need be filed by the limited liability company or any other defendant and the prosecution of the action shall be stayed until 10 days after the motion has been disposed of.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 126.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



ARTICLE 10. Merger and Conversion [17710.01. - 17710.19.]

17710.01.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Converted entity” means the other business entity or foreign other business entity or foreign limited liability company that results from a conversion of a domestic limited liability company under this title.

(b) “Converted limited liability company” means a domestic limited liability company that results from a conversion of an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited liability company pursuant to Section 17710.08.

(c) “Converting limited liability company”
 means a domestic limited liability company that converts to an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited liability company pursuant to this title.

(d) “Converting entity” means an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited liability company that converts to a domestic limited liability company pursuant to Section 17710.08.

(e) “Constituent corporation” means a corporation that is merged with or into one or more limited liability companies, foreign limited liability companies, or other business entities and that includes a surviving corporation.

(f) “Constituent limited liability company” means a limited liability company that is merged with or
 into one or more other limited liability companies, foreign limited liability companies, or other business entities and that includes a surviving limited liability company.

(g) “Constituent other business entity” means an other business entity that is merged with or into one or more limited liability companies or foreign limited liability companies and that includes a surviving other business entity.

(h) “Disappearing limited liability company” means a constituent limited liability company or foreign limited liability company that is not the surviving limited liability company.

(i) “Disappearing other business entity” means a constituent other business entity that is not the surviving other business entity.

(j) “Foreign other business entity” means an other business entity formed under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this state.

(k) “Other business entity” means a corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, business trust, real estate investment trust, or unincorporated association, other than a nonprofit association, but excludes a limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company.

(l) “Surviving limited liability company” means a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company into which one or more other limited liability companies, foreign limited liability companies, other business entities, or foreign business entities are merged.

(m) “Surviving other business entity” means an other business entity into which one or more limited liability companies or foreign limited liability companies are merged.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.02.

(a) A limited liability company may be converted into an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited liability company pursuant to this article if both of the following apply:

(1) Pursuant to a conversion into a domestic or foreign general partnership or limited partnership or into a foreign limited liability company, each of the members of the converting limited liability company receives a percentage interest in the profits and capital of the converted entity equal to that member’s percentage interest in profits and capital of the converting limited liability company as of the effective time of the conversion.

(2) Pursuant to a conversion into an other business entity or foreign other business entity not specified in paragraph (1), both of the following occur:

(A) Each limited liability company interest of the same class is treated equally with respect to any distribution of cash, property, rights, interests, or securities of the converted entity, unless all members of the class consent.

(B) The nonredeemable limited liability company interests of the converting limited liability company are converted only into nonredeemable interests or securities of the converted entity, unless all holders of the unredeemable interests consent.

(b) The conversion of a limited
 liability company to an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited liability company may be effected only if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The law under which the converted entity will exist expressly permits the formation of that entity pursuant to a conversion.

(2) The limited liability company complies with all other requirements of any other law that applies to conversion to the converted entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.03.

(a) A limited liability company that desires to convert to an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited liability company shall approve a plan of conversion.

The plan of conversion shall state all of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the conversion.

(2) The place of the organization of the converted entity and of the converting limited liability company and the name of the converted entity after conversion.

(3) The manner of converting the membership interests of each of the members into shares of,
 securities of, or interests in, the converted entity.

(4) The provisions of the governing documents for the converted entity, including the limited liability company articles of organization and operating agreement, or articles or certificate of incorporation if the converted entity is a corporation, to which the holders of interests in the converted entity are to be bound.

(5) Any other details or provisions that are required by the laws under which the converted entity is organized, or that are desired by the parties.

(b) (1) The plan of conversion shall be approved by all managers and a majority of the members of each class of membership interest or if there are no managers, a majority of the members of each class of membership of the converting limited liability company, unless a greater
 approval is required by the operating agreement of the converting limited liability company.

(2) However, if the members of the limited liability company would become personally liable for any obligations of the converted entity as a result of the conversion, the plan of conversion shall be approved by all of the members of the converting limited liability company, unless the plan of conversion provides that all members will have dissenters’ rights as provided in Article 11 (commencing with Section 17711.01).

(c) Upon the effectiveness of the conversion, all members of the converting limited liability company, except those that exercise dissenters’ rights as provided in Article 11 (commencing with Section 17711.01), shall be deemed parties to any governing documents for the converted entity adopted as part of the plan of conversion, regardless of whether or not the member has
 executed the plan of conversion or the governing documents for the converted entity. Any adoption of governing documents made pursuant to the conversion shall be effective at the effective time or date of the conversion.

(d) Notwithstanding its prior approval, a plan of conversion may be amended before the conversion takes effect if the amendment is approved by all managers and a majority of the members or if there are no managers, a majority of the members of the converting limited liability company and, if the amendment changes any of the principal terms of the plan of conversion, the amendment is approved by the managers and members of the converting limited liability company in the same manner and to the same extent as required for the approval of the original plan of conversion.

(e) The managers by unanimous approval and the members of a converting limited liability company
 may, by majority approval at any time before the conversion is effective, in their discretion, abandon a conversion, without further approval by the managers or members, subject to the contractual rights of third parties other than managers or members.

(f) The converted entity shall keep the plan of conversion at the principal place of business of the converted entity if the converted entity is a domestic limited liability company or foreign other business entity, at the principal office of, or registrar or transfer agent of, the converted entity, if the converted entity is a domestic corporation, or at the office where records are to be kept pursuant to Section 17701.13 if the converted entity is a domestic limited liability company. Upon the request of a member of a converting limited liability company, the authorized person on behalf of the converted entity shall promptly deliver to the member or the holder of shares, interests, or other
 securities, at the expense of the converted entity, a copy of the plan of conversion. A waiver by a member of the rights provided in this subdivision shall be unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 775, Sec. 18.   (AB 506)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.04.

(a) A conversion into an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited liability company shall become effective upon the earliest date that all of the following occur:

(1) The plan of conversion is approved by the members of the converting limited liability company, as provided in Section 17710.03.

(2) All documents required by law to create the converted entity are filed, which documents shall also contain a statement of conversion, if required under Section 17710.06.

(3) The effective date, if set forth in
 the plan of conversion, occurs.

(b) A copy of the certificate of limited partnership, statement of partnership authority, articles of incorporation, or certificate of conversion complying with Section 17710.06, if applicable, duly certified by the Secretary of State, is conclusive evidence of the conversion of the limited liability company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.05.

(a) If the limited liability company is converting into a foreign limited liability company or foreign other business entity, those conversion proceedings shall be in accordance with the laws of the state or place of organization of the foreign limited liability company or foreign other business entity and the conversion shall become effective in accordance with that law.

(b) (1) To enforce an obligation of a limited liability company that has converted to a foreign limited liability company or foreign other business entity, the Secretary of State shall only be the agent for service of process in an action or proceeding against that converted
 foreign entity, if the agent designated for the service of process for that entity is a natural person and cannot be found with due diligence or if the agent is a corporation and no person, to whom delivery may be made, may be located with due diligence, or if no agent has been designated and if none of the officers, members, managers, or agents of that entity may be located after diligent search, and it is shown by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court. The court then may make an order that service be made by personal delivery to the Secretary of State or to an assistant or Deputy Secretary of State of two copies of the process together with two copies of the order, and the order shall set forth an address to which the process shall be sent by the Secretary of State. Service in this manner is deemed complete on the 10th day after delivery of the process to the Secretary of State.

(2) Upon receipt of the process and order and the fee set forth in Section 12197 of the Government Code, the Secretary of State shall provide notice to that entity of the service of the process by forwarding by certified mail, return receipt requested, a copy of the process and order to the address specified in the order.

(3) The Secretary of State shall keep a record of all process served upon the Secretary of State and shall record the time of service and the Secretary of State’s action with respect to the process served. The certificate of the Secretary of State, under the Secretary of State’s official seal, certifying to the receipt of process, the providing of notice of process to that entity, and the forwarding of the process shall be competent and prima facie evidence of the matters
 stated therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.06.

(a) Upon conversion of a limited liability company, one of the following applies:

(1) If the limited liability company is converting into a domestic limited partnership, a statement of conversion shall be completed on a certificate of limited partnership for the converted entity and shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(2) If the limited liability company is converting into a domestic partnership, a statement of conversion shall be completed on the statement of partnership authority for the converted entity. If no statement of partnership authority is filed, a certificate of conversion shall be filed separately with
 the Secretary of State.

(3) If the limited liability company is converting into a domestic corporation, a statement of conversion shall be completed on the articles of incorporation for the converted entity and shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(4) If the limited liability company is converting to a foreign limited liability company or foreign other business entity, a certificate of conversion shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(b) Any certificate or statement of conversion shall be executed and acknowledged by all members of a member-managed limited liability company or all managers of a manager-managed limited liability company, unless a lesser number is provided in the articles of organization or
 operating agreement, and shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The name of the converting limited liability company and the Secretary of State’s file number of the converting limited liability company.

(2) A statement that the principal terms of the plan of conversion were approved by a vote of the members, that equaled or exceeded the vote required under Section 17710.03, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class.

(c) A certificate of conversion shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The name, form, and jurisdiction of organization of the converted entity.

(2) The name, street address, and mailing address of the converted entity’s agent for service of process. If a corporation qualified under Section 1505 is designated as the agent, no address for it shall be set forth.

(3) The street address of the converted entity’s principal office.

(d) The filing with the Secretary of State of a certificate of conversion, a certificate of limited partnership, a statement of partnership authority, or articles of incorporation containing a statement of conversion as set forth in subdivision (a) shall have the effect of the filing of a certificate of cancellation by the converting limited liability company, and no converting limited liability company that has made the filing is required to take any action under Article 7 (commencing with
 Section 17707.01) as a result of that conversion.

(e) For the purposes of this title, the certificate of conversion shall be on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 127.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.07.

(a) Whenever a limited liability company or other business entity having any real property in this state converts into a limited liability company or an other business entity pursuant to the laws of this state or of the state or place where the limited liability company or other business entity was organized, and the laws of the state or place of organization, including this state, of the converting limited liability company or other converting entity provide substantially that the conversion vests in the converted limited liability company or other converted entity all the real property of the converting limited liability company or other converting entity, the filing for record in the office of the county recorder
 of any county in this state where any of the real property of the converting limited liability company or other converting entity is located of either of the following shall evidence record ownership in the converted limited liability company or other converted entity of all interest of the converting limited liability company or other converting entity in and to the real property located in that county:

(1) A certificate of conversion or a statement of partnership authority, a certificate of limited partnership, or articles of incorporation complying with Section 17710.06 certified on or after the effective date of the conversion by the Secretary of State.

(2) A copy of a certificate of conversion or a statement of partnership authority, certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization,
 articles of incorporation, or other certificate or document evidencing the creation of a foreign other business entity or foreign limited liability company by conversion, containing a statement of conversion, certified by the Secretary of State or an authorized public official of the state or place pursuant to the laws of which the conversion is effected.

(b) A filed and, if appropriate, recorded certificate of conversion or a statement of partnership authority, certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, articles or certificate of incorporation, or other certificate evidencing the creation of a foreign other business entity or foreign limited liability company by conversion, containing a statement of conversion, filed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17710.06, stating the name of the converting limited liability
 company or other converting entity in whose name property was held before the conversion and the name of the converted entity or converted limited liability company, but not containing all of the other information required by Section 17710.06, operates with respect to the entities named to the extent provided in subdivision (a).

(c) Recording of a certificate of conversion, or a statement of partnership authority, certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, articles of incorporation, or other certificate evidencing the creation of an other business entity or a limited liability company by conversion, containing a statement of conversion, in accordance with subdivision (a), shall create, in favor of bona fide purchasers or encumbrances for value, a conclusive presumption that the conversion was validly completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.08.

(a) An other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited liability company may be converted to a domestic limited liability company pursuant to this article only if the converting entity is authorized by the laws pursuant to which it is organized to effect the conversion.

(b) An other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited liability company that desires to convert into a domestic limited liability company shall approve a plan of conversion or another instrument as is required to be approved to effect the conversion pursuant to the laws under which that entity is organized.

(c) The conversion of an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited liability company into a domestic limited liability company shall be approved by the number or percentage of the members, managers, shareholders, or holders of interest of the converting entity as is required by the laws under which that entity is organized, or a greater or lesser percentage, subject to applicable laws, as set forth in the converting entity’s partnership agreement, articles of organization, operating agreement, articles or certificate of incorporation, or other governing document.

(d) The conversion by an other business entity or a foreign other business entity or a foreign limited liability company into a domestic limited liability company shall be effective
 under this article at the time the conversion is effective under the laws under which the converting entity is organized, as long as the articles of organization containing a statement of conversion has been filed with the Secretary of State. If the converting entity’s governing law is silent as to the effectiveness of the conversion, the conversion shall be effective upon the completion of all acts required under this title to form a limited liability company.

(e) If the converting foreign limited liability company or foreign limited liability partnership is authorized to transact intrastate business in this state, the filing with the Secretary of State of its articles of organization containing a statement of conversion pursuant to the laws under which the converting foreign limited liability company or foreign other business entity is
 organized shall have the effect of the filing of a certificate of cancellation by the converting foreign limited partnership or foreign limited liability company and no converting foreign limited liability company or foreign limited partnership that has made the filing is required to file a certificate of cancellation under Section 15909.07 or 17708.06 as a result of that conversion. If a converting other business entity is a foreign corporation qualified to transact intrastate business in this state, the foreign corporation shall, by virtue of the filing, automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.09.

(a) An entity that converts into another entity pursuant to this article is for all purposes other than for the purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the same entity that existed before the conversion and the conversion shall not be deemed a transfer of property.

(b) Upon a conversion taking effect, all of the following apply:

(1) All the rights and property, whether real, personal, or mixed, of the converting entity or converting limited liability company are
 vested in the converted entity or converted limited liability
 company.

(2) All debts, liabilities, and obligations of the converting entity or converting limited liability company continue as debts, liabilities, and obligations of the converted entity or converted limited liability company.

(3) All rights of creditors and liens upon the property of the converting entity or converting limited liability company shall be preserved unimpaired and remain enforceable against the converted entity or converted limited liability company to the same extent as against the converting entity or converting limited liability company as if the conversion had not occurred.

(4) Any action or proceeding pending by or against the converting entity or converting limited liability
 company may be continued against the converted entity or converted limited liability company as if the conversion had not occurred.

(c) A member of a converting limited liability company is liable for both of the following:

(1) All obligations of the converting limited liability company for which the member was personally liable before the conversion.

(2) All obligations of the converted entity incurred after the conversion takes effect, but those obligations may be satisfied only out of property of the entity if that member of a limited liability company, or a shareholder in a corporation, or unless expressly provided otherwise in the articles of organization or other governing documents, a limited partner of a
 limited partnership, or a holder of equity securities in another converted entity if the holders of equity securities in that entity are not personally liable for the obligations of that entity under the law under which the
 entity is organized or its governing documents.

(d) A member of a converted limited liability company remains liable for any and all obligations of the converting entity for which the member was personally liable before the conversion, but only to the extent that the member was liable for the obligations of the converting entity prior to the conversion. 

(e) If the other party to a transaction with the limited liability company reasonably believes when entering into the transaction that the limited liability company member is a general partner, the limited liability company member is liable for the obligations incurred by the limited liability company within 90 days after the conversion takes effect. The limited liability company member’s liability for all other
 obligations of the limited liability company incurred after the conversion takes effect is that of a limited liability
 company member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.10.

Mergers of limited liability companies shall be governed by Sections 17710.11 to 17710.19, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.11.

The following entities may be merged pursuant to this article:

(a) Two or more limited liability companies, two or more foreign limited liability companies, or one or more limited liability companies and one or more foreign limited liability companies into one limited liability company or foreign limited liability company except that there must be at least one constituent domestic limited liability company for a surviving limited liability company.

(b) One or more limited liability companies, one or more foreign limited liability companies, and one or more other business entities into one of those other business entities or
 foreign other business entities.

(c) One or more limited liability companies, one or more foreign limited liability companies, and one or more other business entities or foreign other business entities into one limited liability company or foreign limited liability company.

(d) Notwithstanding this section, the merger of any number of limited liability companies with any number of other business entities or foreign other business entities may be effected only if the other business entities that are organized in this state are authorized by the laws under which they are organized to effect the merger, and the following apply:

(1) If a limited liability company is the surviving limited liability company, the foreign
 other business entities are not prohibited by the laws under which they are organized from effecting that merger.

(2) If a foreign limited liability company or foreign other business entity is the survivor of the merger, the laws of the jurisdiction under which the survivor is organized authorize that merger. Notwithstanding the first sentence of this paragraph, if one or more domestic corporations is also a party to the merger described in that sentence, the merger may be effected only if, with respect to any foreign other business entity that is a corporation, the foreign corporation is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect that merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.12.

(a) Each limited liability company and other business entity that desires to merge shall approve an agreement of merger.

The agreement of merger shall be approved by all managers and a majority of the members of each class of membership interests of each constituent limited liability company, unless a greater approval is required by the operating agreement of the constituent limited liability company. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, if the members of any constituent limited liability company become personally liable for any obligations of a constituent limited liability company or constituent other business entity as a result of the merger, the principal terms of the agreement of merger shall be approved by all of the members of the
 constituent limited liability company, unless the agreement of merger provides that all members shall have the dissenters’ rights provided in Article 11 (commencing with Section 17711.01). The agreement of merger shall be approved on behalf of each constituent other business entity by those persons required to approve the merger by the laws under which it is organized. Other persons, including a parent of a constituent limited liability company, may be parties to the agreement of merger. The agreement of merger shall state all of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the merger.

(2) The name and place of the organization of the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity, and of each disappearing limited liability company and disappearing other business entity, and the agreement of merger may change the name of the surviving limited liability
 company, the new name may be the same as or similar to the name of a disappearing domestic or foreign limited liability company, subject to Section 17701.08.
